Louisiana, session 2026, HB1103.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1730.29(A)(20) and 1730.40(D) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1730.29. Regulation of construction or improvement of industrial facilities
A. Excluding the applicable requirements of the International Plumbing
Code, the provisions of this Part shall not apply to the construction or improvement
inside the secured or fenced confines of the following types of industrial facilities
that are engaged in activities defined or classified under one or more of the following
subsectors, industry groups, or industries of the 2012 North American Industry
Classification System (NAICS):
* * *
(20) 334511 search, detection, navigation, guidance, aeronautical, and
nautical system and instrument manufacturing.
* * *
§1730.40. Municipalities and parishes; home rule charter
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no political
subdivision shall require a building permit for, apply the provisions of a building
code to, or otherwise regulate pursuant to this Part the construction or improvement
inside the secured or fenced confines of the industrial facilities exempted in R.S.
40:1730.29(A)(20).
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1103 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.